Washington statutes.
RCW 7.72.020

Scope.

(1) The previous existing applicable law of this state on product liability is modified only to the extent set forth in this chapter.

(2) Nothing in this chapter shall prevent the recovery of direct or consequential economic loss under Title 62A RCW.

[ 1981 c 27 s 3.]